Utah statutes.
78B-1-120.   Jurors and witnesses -- Fees in criminal cases -- Daily report
of attendance.
Every witness in a criminal case subpoenaed for the state, or for a defendant
by order of the court at the expense of the state, and every juror, whether
grand or trial, shall, unless temporarily excused, in person report daily to
the clerk.  No per diem shall be allowed for any day upon which attendance is
not so reported.
